Nebraska, session 109, LB813.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB813 LB813
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 48-604, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
48-604 As used in the Employment Security Law, unless the context
otherwise requires, employment shall mean:
(1) Any service performed, including service in interstate commerce,
for wages under a contract of hire, written or oral, express or implied;
(2) The term employment shall include an individual's entire
service, performed within or both within and without this state if (a)
the service is localized in this state, (b) the service is not localized
in any state but some of the service is performed in this state and the
base of operations or, if there is no base of operations, then the place
from which such service is directed or controlled is in this state or the
base of operations or place from which such service is directed or
controlled is not in any state in which some part of the service is
performed but the individual's residence is in this state, (c) the
service shall be deemed to be localized within a state if (i) the service
is performed entirely within such state or (ii) the service is performed
both within and without such state, but the service performed without
such state is incidental to the individual's service within the state,
for example, is temporary or transitory in nature or consists of isolated
transactions;
(3) Services performed outside the state and services performed
outside the United States as follows:
(a) Services not covered under subdivision (2) of this section and
performed entirely without this state, with respect to no part of which
contributions are required under an unemployment compensation law of any
other state or of the federal government, shall be deemed to be
employment subject to the Employment Security Law if the commissioner
approves the election of the employer, for whom such services are
performed, that the entire service of such individual shall be deemed to
be employment subject to such law;
-2-

LB813 LB813
2026 2026
(b) Services of an individual wherever performed within the United
States or Canada if (i) such service is not covered under the employment
compensation law of any other state or Canada and (ii) the place from
which the service is directed or controlled is in this state; and
(c)(i) Services of an individual who is a citizen of the United
States, performed outside the United States except in Canada in the
employ of an American employer, other than service which is deemed
employment under subdivisions (2) and (3)(a) and (b) of this section or
the parallel provisions of another state's law, if:
(A) The employer's principal place of business in the United States
is located in this state;
(B) The employer has no place of business in the United States, but
the employer is an individual who is a resident of this state; the
employer is a corporation or limited liability company which is organized
under the laws of this state; or the employer is a partnership or a trust
and the number of the partners or trustees who are residents of this
state is greater than the number who are residents of any other state; or
(C) None of the criteria of subdivisions (A) and (B) of this
subdivision are met, but the employer has elected coverage in this state
or, the employer having failed to elect coverage in any state, the
individual has filed a claim for benefits based on such service under the
laws of this state.
(ii) American employer, for the purposes of this subdivision, shall
mean: (A) An individual who is a resident of the United States; (B) a
partnership if two-thirds or more of the partners are residents of the
United States; (C) a trust if all the trustees are residents of the
United States; or (D) a corporation or limited liability company
organized under the laws of the United States or of any state.
(iii) The term United States for the purpose of this section
includes the states, the District of Columbia, the Virgin Islands, and
the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico;
-3-

LB813 LB813
2026 2026
(4)(a) Service performed in the employ of this state or any
political subdivision thereof or any instrumentality of any one or more
of the foregoing or any instrumentality which is wholly owned by this
state and one or more other states or political subdivisions, or any
service performed in the employ of any instrumentality of this state or
of any political subdivision thereof and one or more other states or
political subdivisions if such service is excluded from employment as
defined in the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, solely by reason
of 26 U.S.C. 3306(c)(7), and is not otherwise excluded under this
section;
(b) Service performed by an individual in the employ of a religious,
charitable, educational, or other organization, but only if the following
conditions are met: (i) The service is excluded from employment as
defined in the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, solely by reason
of 26 U.S.C. 3306(c)(8), and is not otherwise excluded under this
section; and (ii) the organization had four or more individuals in
employment for some portion of a day in each of twenty different weeks,
whether or not such weeks were consecutive, within either the current or
preceding calendar year, regardless of whether they were employed at the
same moment of time;
(c)(i) Service performed by an individual in agricultural labor if
such service is performed for a person who during any calendar quarter in
either the current or preceding calendar year paid remuneration in cash
of twenty thousand dollars or more to individuals employed in
agricultural labor, or for some portion of a day in each of twenty
different calendar weeks, whether or not such weeks were consecutive, in
either the current or the preceding calendar year, employed in
agricultural labor ten or more individuals, regardless of whether they
were employed at the same moment of time.
(ii) For purposes of this subdivision:
(A) Any individual who is a member of a crew furnished by a crew
-4-

LB813 LB813
2026 2026
leader to perform services in agricultural labor for any other person
shall be treated as an employee of such crew leader if such crew leader
holds a valid certificate of registration under the Migrant and Seasonal
Agricultural Worker Protection Act, as amended, 29 U.S.C. 1801 et seq.;
substantially all the members of such crew operate or maintain tractors,
mechanized harvesting or cropdusting equipment, or any other mechanized
equipment, which is provided by such crew leader; and such individual is
not an employee of such other person within the meaning of any other
provisions of this section; and
(B) In case any individual who is furnished by a crew leader to
perform service in agricultural labor for any other person and who is not
treated as an employee of such crew leader under subdivision (A) of this
subdivision, such other person and not the crew leader shall be treated
as the employer of such individual and such other person shall be treated
as having paid cash remuneration to such individual in an amount equal to
the amount of cash remuneration paid to such individual by the crew
leader, either on his or her own behalf or on behalf of such other
person, for the service in agricultural labor performed for such other
person; and
(d) Service performed by an individual in domestic service in a
private home, local college club, or local chapter of a college
fraternity or sorority if performed for a person who paid cash
remuneration of one thousand dollars or more in the current calendar year
or the preceding calendar year to individuals employed in such domestic
service in any calendar quarter;
(5) Services performed by an individual for wages, including wages
received under a contract of hire, shall be deemed to be employment
unless it is shown to the satisfaction of the commissioner that (a) such
individual has been and will continue to be free from control or
direction over the performance of such services, both under his or her
contract of service and in fact, (b) such service is either outside the
-5-

LB813 LB813
2026 2026
usual course of the business for which such service is performed or such
service is performed outside of all the places of business of the
enterprise for which such service is performed, and (c) such individual
is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation,
profession, or business. The provisions of this subdivision are not
intended to be a codification of the common law and shall be considered
complete as written;
(6) The term employment shall not include:
(a) Agricultural labor, except as provided in subdivision (4)(c) of
this section;
(b) Domestic service, except as provided in subdivision (4)(d) of
this section, in a private home, local college club, or local chapter of
a college fraternity or sorority;
(c) Service not in the course of the employer's trade or business
performed in any calendar quarter by an employee, unless the cash
remuneration paid for such service is fifty dollars or more and such
service is performed by an individual who is regularly employed by such
employer to perform such service and, for the purposes of this
subdivision, an individual shall be deemed to be regularly employed by an
employer during a calendar quarter only if (i) on each of some twenty-
four days during such quarter such individual performs for such employer
for some portion of the day service not in the course of the employer's
trade or business, or (ii) such individual was regularly employed, as
determined under subdivision (c)(i) of this subdivision, by such employer
in the performance of such service during the preceding calendar quarter;
(d) Service performed by an individual in the employ of his or her
son, daughter, or spouse and service performed by a child under the age
of twenty-one in the employ of his or her father or mother;
(e) Service performed in the employ of the United States Government
or an instrumentality of the United States immune under the Constitution
of the United States from the contributions imposed by sections 48-648
-6-

LB813 LB813
2026 2026
and 48-649 to 48-649.04, except that, to the extent that the Congress of
the United States shall permit states to require any instrumentalities of
the United States to make payments into an unemployment fund under a
state unemployment compensation act, all of the Employment Security Law
shall be applicable to such instrumentalities and to services performed
for such instrumentalities in the same manner, to the same extent, and on
the same terms as to all other employers, individuals, and services,
except that if this state is not certified for any year by the Secretary
of Labor of the United States under section 3304 of the Internal Revenue
Code as defined in section 49-801.01, the payments required of such
instrumentalities with respect to such year shall be refunded by the
commissioner from the fund in the same manner and within the same period
as is provided in section 48-660, with respect to contributions
erroneously collected;
(f) Service performed in the employ of this state or any political
subdivision thereof or any instrumentality of any one or more of the
foregoing if such services are performed by an individual in the exercise
of his or her duties: (i) As an elected official; (ii) as a member of the
legislative body or a member of the judiciary of a state or political
subdivision thereof; (iii) as a member of the Army National Guard or Air
National Guard; (iv) as an employee serving on a temporary basis in case
of fire, storm, snow, earthquake, flood, or similar emergency; or (v) as
an election official or election worker if the amount of remuneration
received by the individual during the calendar year for services as an
election official or election worker is less than one thousand dollars;
(g) For the purposes of subdivisions (4)(a) and (4)(b) of this
section, service performed:
(i) In the employ of (A) a church or convention or association of
churches or (B) an organization which is operated primarily for religious
purposes and which is operated, supervised, controlled, or principally
supported by a church or convention or association of churches;
-7-

LB813 LB813
2026 2026
(ii) By a duly ordained, commissioned, or licensed minister of a
church in the exercise of his or her ministry or by a member of a
religious order in the exercise of the duties required by such order;
(iii) In a facility conducted for the purpose of carrying out a
program of rehabilitation for an individual whose earning capacity is
impaired by age or physical or mental deficiency or injury, or providing
remunerative work for the individuals who because of their impaired
physical or mental capacity cannot be readily absorbed in the competitive
labor market, by an individual receiving such rehabilitation or
remunerative work;
(iv) As part of an unemployment work relief or work-training program
assisted or financed in whole or in part by any federal agency or an
agency of a state or political subdivision thereof, by an individual
receiving such work relief or work training; or
(v) By an inmate of a custodial or penal institution;
(h) Service with respect to which unemployment compensation is
payable under an unemployment compensation system established by an act
of Congress;
(i) Service performed in any calendar quarter in the employ of any
organization exempt from income tax under section 501(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01, other than an organization
described in section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in
section 49-801.01, or under section 521 thereof, if the remuneration for
such service is less than fifty dollars;
(j) Service performed in the employ of a school, college, or
university, if such service is performed (i) by a student who is
enrolled, regularly attending classes at, and working for such school,
college, or university pursuant to a financial assistance arrangement
with such school, college, or university or (ii) by the spouse of such
student, if such spouse is advised, at the time such spouse commences to
perform such service, that (A) the employment of such spouse to perform
-8-

LB813 LB813
2026 2026
such service is provided under a program to provide financial assistance
to such student by such school, college, or university and (B) such
employment will not be covered by any program of unemployment insurance;
(k) Service performed as a student nurse in the employ of a hospital
or nurses training school by an individual who is enrolled and is
regularly attending classes in a nurses training school chartered or
approved pursuant to state law; and service performed as an intern in the
employ of a hospital by an individual who has completed a four-year
course in a medical school chartered or approved pursuant to state law;
(l) Service performed by an individual as a real estate salesperson,
as an insurance agent, or as an insurance solicitor, if all such service
performed by such individual is performed for remuneration solely by way
of commission;
(m) Service performed by an individual under the age of eighteen in
the delivery or distribution of newspapers or shopping news, not
including delivery or distribution to any point for subsequent delivery
or distribution;
(n) Service performed by an individual in the sale, delivery, or
distribution of newspapers or magazines under a written contract in which
(i) the individual acknowledges that the individual performing the
service and the service are not covered and (ii) the newspapers and
magazines are sold by him or her at a fixed price with his or her
compensation being based on the retention of the excess of such price
over the amount at which the newspapers or magazines are charged to him
or her, whether or not he or she is guaranteed a minimum amount of
compensation for such service, or is entitled to be credited with the
unsold newspapers or magazines turned back;
(o) Service performed by an individual who is enrolled at a
nonprofit or public educational institution which normally maintains a
regular faculty and curriculum and normally has a regularly organized
body of students in attendance at the place where its educational
-9-

LB813 LB813
2026 2026
activities are carried on, as a student in a full-time program, taken for
credit at such institution, which combines academic instruction with work
experience, if such service is an integral part of such program, and such
institution has so certified to the employer, except that this
subdivision shall not apply to service performed in a program established
for or on behalf of an employer or a group of employers;
(p) Service performed in the employ of a hospital, if such service
is performed by a patient of the hospital;
(q) Service performed for a motor carrier, as defined in 49 U.S.C.
13102 or section 75-302, as amended, by a lessor leasing one or more
motor vehicles driven by the lessor or one or more drivers provided by
the lessor under a lease, with the motor carrier as lessee, executed
pursuant to 49 C.F.R. part 376, Title 291, Chapter 3, as amended, of the
rules and regulations of the Public Service Commission, or the rules and
regulations of the Division of Motor Carrier Services. This shall not
preclude the determination of an employment relationship between the
lessor and any personnel provided by the lessor in the conduct of the
service performed for the lessee;
(r) Service performed by an individual for a business engaged in
compilation of marketing databases if such service consists only of the
processing of data and is performed in the residence of the individual;
(s) Service performed by an individual as a volunteer research
subject who is paid on a per study basis for scientific, medical, or
drug-related testing for any organization other than one described in
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section
49-801.01 or any governmental entity;
(t) Service performed by a direct seller if:
(i) Such person is engaged in sales primarily in person and is:
(A) Engaged in the trade or business of selling or soliciting the
sale of consumer products or services to any buyer on a buy-sell basis or
a deposit-commission basis for resale, by the buyer or any other person,
-10-

LB813 LB813
2026 2026
in the home or otherwise than in a permanent retail establishment;
(B) Engaged in the trade or business of selling or soliciting the
sale of consumer products or services in the home or otherwise than in a
permanent retail establishment; or
(C) Engaged in the trade or business of the delivering or
distribution of newspapers or shopping news, including any services
directly related to such trade or business;
(ii) Substantially all the remuneration, whether or not paid in
cash, for the performance of the services described in subdivision (t)(i)
of this subdivision is directly related to sales or other output,
including the performance of services, rather than to the number of hours
worked; and
(iii) The services performed by the person are performed pursuant to
a written contract between such person and the person for whom the
services are performed and the contract provides that the person will not
be treated as an employee for federal and state tax purposes. Sales by a
person whose business is conducted primarily by telephone or any other
form of electronic sales or solicitation is not service performed by a
direct seller under this subdivision;
(u) Service performed by an individual who is a participant in the
National and Community Service State Grant Program, also known as
AmeriCorps, because a participant is not considered an employee of the
organization receiving assistance under the national service laws through
which the participant is engaging in service pursuant to 42 U.S.C.
12511(30)(B);
(v) Service performed at a penal or custodial institution by a
person committed to a penal or custodial institution; and
(w)(i) Service by a marketplace network contractor if:
(A) The marketplace network contractor and marketplace network
platform agree in writing that the marketplace network contractor is an
independent contractor and not an employee of the marketplace network
-11-

LB813 LB813
2026 2026
platform;
(B) The marketplace network platform does not unilaterally prescribe
specific hours during which the marketplace network contractor must be
available to accept service requests submitted through the marketplace
network platform's digital network;
(C) The marketplace network platform does not prohibit the
marketplace network contractor from engaging in outside employment or
performing services through other marketplace network platforms except
while the marketplace network contractor is performing services through
the marketplace network platform's digital network; and
(D) The marketplace network platform is not allowed to terminate the
contract of the marketplace network contractor for not accepting a
specific service request.
(ii) For purposes of subdivision (6)(w) of this section:
(A) Marketplace network contractor means a person to which all of
the following apply: Such person enters a written agreement with a
marketplace network platform to use the marketplace network platform's
digital network to connect with individuals or entities seeking services
offered by the marketplace network contractor; and such person performs
services for individuals or entities through a marketplace network
platform's digital network in exchange for compensation or payment; and
such person does not perform services at a physical business location
operated by the marketplace network platform in this state; and
(B) Marketplace network platform means a person that maintains a
digital network to facilitate services by marketplace network contractors
to individuals or entities seeking those services, and accepts requests
from the public only through the platform's digital network or mobile
application, and not by telephone, facsimile, or in-person at a retail
location.
(iii) Subdivision (6)(w) of this section shall not apply to services
performed by a marketplace network contractor:
-12-

LB813 LB813
2026 2026
(A) For any employer described in subdivision (4)(a) or (4)(b) of
this section or in section 48-603.01; or
(B) If with respect to such services a tax is required to be paid
under any federal law imposing a tax against which credit may be taken
for contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment
compensation fund or which as a condition for full tax credit against the
tax imposed by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, is required
to be covered under the Employment Security Law;
(7) If the services performed during one-half or more of any pay
period by an individual for the person employing him or her constitute
employment, all the services of such individual for such period shall be
deemed to be employment, but if the services performed during more than
one-half of any such pay period by an individual for the person employing
him or her do not constitute employment, then none of the services of
such individual for such period shall be deemed to be employment. As used
in this subdivision, the term pay period means a period, of not more than
thirty-one consecutive days, for which a payment of remuneration is
ordinarily made to such individual by the person employing him or her.
This subdivision shall not be applicable with respect to services
performed in a pay period by an individual for the person employing him
or her when any of such service is excepted by subdivision (6)(h) of this
section; and
(8) Notwithstanding the foregoing exclusions from the definition of
employment, services shall be deemed to be in employment if with respect
to such services a tax is required to be paid under any federal law
imposing a tax against which credit may be taken for contributions
required to be paid into a state unemployment compensation fund or which
as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the Federal
Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, is required to be covered under the
Employment Security Law.
Sec. 2. Original section 48-604, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
-13-

LB813 LB813
2026 2026
is repealed.
-14-